Idaho, session 2025, H0069.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Motor Voter Act."
SECTION 2. That Section 34-404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-404. REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS -- POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION --
UNAFFILIATED DESIGNATION. (1) All electors must register before being able
to vote at any primary, general, special, school or any other election gov-
erned by the provisions of title 34, Idaho Code. Registration of a qualified
person occurs when a legible, accurate and complete registration applica-
tion and proof of identity and residence are received in the office of the
county clerk or at the polls pursuant to section 34-408(3), 34-408A, or
34-1012, Idaho Code.
(2) The Idaho transportation department, through the division of motor
vehicles and its driver's licensing offices, shall register to vote each
eligible elector who applies for the issuance, renewal, or correction of any
type of driver's license pursuant to chapter 3, title 49, Idaho Code, or for
an identification card pursuant to sections 49-2442 and 49-2443, Idaho Code,
by completing a registration application provided for in subsection (1) of
this section for the eligible elector. Each driver's licensing office shall
forward completed registration applications to the office of the county
clerk on a weekly basis and on the business day prior to the closing of regis-
tration. Registration applications remitted during closure of registration
shall be held pursuant to section 34-408, Idaho Code. The division of motor
vehicles shall provide for an elector to opt out of registration provided for
in this subsection.
(2) (3) Each elector may select on the registration application an af-
filiation with a political party qualified to participate in elections pur-
suant to section 34-501, Idaho Code, or may select to be designated as unaf-
filiated. The county clerk shall record the party affiliation or unaffili-
ated designation so selected as part of the elector's registration record.
If an elector shall fail or refuse to make such a selection, the county clerk
shall enter on the registration records that such elector is unaffiliated.


(3) (4) In order to provide an elector with the appropriate primary
election ballot, pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, the poll book for
primary elections shall include the party affiliation or designation as
unaffiliated for each elector so registered. An unaffiliated elector shall
declare to the poll worker which primary election ballot the elector chooses
to vote in, pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, and the poll worker or
other authorized election personnel shall record such declaration in the
poll book. The poll book shall contain checkoff boxes to allow the poll
worker or other authorized election personnel to record such unaffiliated
elector's selection.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.